Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
TRANSFER COUNCIL MEMBERSHIP
SECTION 1.  ORS 350.426 is amended to read:
350.426. (1) The Transfer Council is established, consisting of 15 voting members, appointed by
the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, and one nonvoting, ex officio member.
(2) Before  appointing the voting members, the commission shall request nominations from official
student, faculty and administrator organizations at public universities  listed in ORS 352.002, com-
munity colleges operated  under ORS chapter 341 and high schools in this state. The 15 voting
members of the council shall consist of:
(a) Five academic officers, two  of whom are currently employed at a public university, two of
whom are currently employed at a community college and one of  whom is currently employed at a
public high school in this state;
(b) Four faculty members, two of whom are currently employed at a public university  and two
of whom are currently employed at a community college;
(c) One teacher who both teaches accelerated college credit programs as  defined in ORS 340.315
and is currently employed  either by an education service district or  at a  public high school in
this state;
(d) Two individuals who specialize in assisting students who transfer  between institutions, one
of whom is  currently employed at a public university and one of whom is currently employed at a
community college; and
(e) Three students, one of whom is currently enrolled at a public university, one of whom is
currently enrolled at a community  college and one of whom is currently enrolled at a high school
in this state.
(3) The chairperson of the commission, or a designee of the chairperson of the  commission, shall
serve as a nonvoting, ex officio member.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1522 (SB 1522-B) Page 1
(4)(a) The term of  office of each voting member of the council is two years. Before the expiration
of the term of a member, the commission shall appoint a successor. A member is  eligible for reap-
pointment.
(b) In order to serve as a member of the  council, an individual must at all times meet the
qualifications for the appointment. If at any time a member fails to meet the qualifications for  the
member’s appointment, the position is vacant.
(c) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the commission shall make an  appointment to become
immediately effective for the unexpired term.
(5)(a) The council:
(A) Shall select one or more of its members as chairperson or as cochairpersons; and
(B) May establish, in the manner set forth in this subsection, one  or more subcommittees for the
purpose of advising the council on how to best fulfill its duties.
(b) For a subcommittee established under this subsection  that will make recommendations to the
council  on  a subject that will be submitted by the council to the commission under ORS 350.429
(1)(d)(A) to (D), the  council may appoint any faculty member who is employed by a public university
listed in ORS  352.002 or a community college operated under ORS chapter 341, provided that the
subcommittee consists of equal numbers of faculty from public universities and community  colleges.
(c) For  a subcommittee established under this subsection that will not make recommendations
to the council on a subject that will be submitted by the council  to the commission under ORS
350.429 (1)(d)(A) to (D), the council may appoint any individual  employed by a public university
listed in ORS 352.002 or a  community college operated under ORS chapter 341, including faculty,
registrars, academic advisors and academic administrators.
(d) Appointment to a subcommittee established under this subsection does  not entitle an indi-
vidual to vote as a member of the council.
(6)(a) A majority of the voting members of the council constitutes a quorum for the  transaction
of business.
(b)(A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B) of  this paragraph, official action by the council
requires the approval of a majority of the voting members of the council.
(B) Official action by  the council on recommendations to be made to the commission under ORS
350.429 (1)(d)(A) to (D) requires the approval of three-fifths of the voting members of the council.
(c) Two or more voting  members of the council who disagree with recommendations that are
submitted to the commission under ORS 350.429 (1)(d)(A) to (D) may jointly submit  a minority report
to the commission that  contains alternate recommendations. A minority report created under this
paragraph shall be submitted to the commission with the majority recommendations.
(7)(a) A majority of the members of a  subcommittee established under subsection (5) of this
section constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business of the subcommittee.
(b)(A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, official action by  a subcom-
mittee established under subsection (5) of this section requires approval of a  majority of the mem-
bers of the subcommittee.
(B) Official action by a subcommittee on recommendations to be made  to the council on a sub-
ject that will be submitted by  the council to the commission under ORS 350.429 (1)(d)(A) to (D) re-
quires the approval of three-fifths of the members of the subcommittee.
(c) Two or more members of a subcommittee who  disagree with recommendations that are sub-
mitted to the council on a subject that will be submitted by the council to the commission  under
ORS 350.429 (1)(d)(A) to (D) may jointly  submit a minority report to the council that contains al-
ternate recommendations. A minority report created under this paragraph shall be  submitted to the
council with the majority recommendations.
(8)(a) The council shall meet at least every three months at a  place, day and hour determined
by the chairperson or cochairpersons.
(b) In addition to the meetings required  under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the commission
may call a meeting of the council if the commission finds a meeting to  be necessary and a meeting
is not called by the chairperson or cochairpersons.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1522 (SB 1522-B) Page 2
IN-STATE TUITION PROVISIONS
SECTION 2.  ORS 350.290 is amended to read:
350.290. (1) A public  university listed in ORS 352.002 or a community college shall charge an
enrolled  student  who is not a resident of this state and who is attending classes as an undergraduate
or graduate student on a public university or community college campus in this state  tuition and
fees no greater than the resident rate if the student:
(a)(A) Served in the Armed Forces of the United States;
(B) Was relieved or discharged from that service with either an honorable discharge or a gen-
eral discharge under honorable conditions; and
(C) Provides proof that the  student has established a physical presence in Oregon within 12
months of being enrolled at the public university or community college;
(b) Was, or is the dependent of, a resident of  Oregon who left the state within the previous five
years in order  to serve, and who subsequently served, in the Armed Forces of the United States or
in an international position with the state, the  federal government or a humanitarian aid organiza-
tion; or
(c)(A) Was, or is the dependent of, a resident of Oregon who left  the state more than five years
ago in order to serve, and who subsequently served, in the Armed Forces  of the United States or
in an international position with the state, the  federal government or a humanitarian aid organiza-
tion; and
(B) Since leaving the state in  the manner provided in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, has
never established residence in another state.
(2) A person who served  in the Armed Forces of the United States or in an international posi-
tion with the state, the federal government or a humanitarian aid  organization and who receives
federal tuition benefits in excess of the  tuition and fees the person is charged under subsection (1)
of this section at a public university listed in ORS 352.002 or a community college where  the person
is enrolled shall pay tuition and fees equal to the federal tuition benefits received.
(3)(a) Except as  provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, distance education and self-
support courses as identified by  each public university listed in ORS 352.002 and community college
are exempt from the tuition reduction provisions of this section.
(b) The tuition reduction provisions of this section apply  to distance education courses
as identified by each public university listed in ORS 352.002 and  community college that are
taken by a person who:
(A) Is eligible to receive the tuition reduction provisions of  this section when attending
classes as an undergraduate or graduate student  on a public university or community college
campus in this state; and
(B) Served in the Armed Forces of the United States.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 352.287 is amended to read:
352.287. (1) The governing board of a public university  listed in ORS 352.002 shall exempt a
student who is not a citizen or a lawful permanent resident of the United States from paying  non-
resident tuition and fees  for enrollment as an undergraduate student and as a graduate student in
a degree program at a public university listed in ORS 352.002 if the student:
(a) During each of the three years immediately prior to receiving a high  school diploma or a
modified diploma or leaving school before receiving  a high school diploma or a modified diploma,
attended an elementary or a secondary school in this state;
(b) During each of the five  years immediately prior to receiving a high school diploma or a
modified diploma or leaving school before receiving  a high school diploma or a modified diploma,
attended an elementary or a secondary school  in any state or territory of the United States, the
District of Columbia or the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico;
(c) Received a high  school diploma or a modified diploma from a secondary school in this state
or received the equivalent of a high school diploma; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 1522 (SB 1522-B) Page 3
(d) Shows intention to become a citizen or a lawful permanent resident of the United  States by
submitting to the public university the student attends or plans to attend an official copy of  the
student’s application to register with a federal immigration program or federal  deportation deferral
program or a statement of intent  that the student will seek to obtain citizenship as permitted under
federal law.
(2) The  governing board shall exempt a student who is financially dependent upon a person who
is not a citizen or a lawful permanent  resident of the United States from paying nonresident tuition
and fees  for enrollment as an undergraduate student and as a graduate student in a degree program
at a public university listed in ORS 352.002 if the student:
(a) During each of the  three years immediately prior to receiving a high school diploma or a
modified diploma or leaving school before receiving a high  school diploma or a modified diploma,
attended an elementary or a secondary school in this state and resided in this state with the person
upon whom the student is dependent;
(b) During each of the five years immediately prior to receiving a  high school diploma or a
modified diploma or leaving school before receiving a high  school diploma or a modified diploma,
attended an elementary or a secondary school in any state or  territory of the United States, the
District of Columbia or the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico and  resided with the person upon whom
the student is dependent;
(c) Received a high  school diploma or a modified diploma from a secondary school in this state
or received the equivalent of a high school diploma; and
(d) For a student who is not already a citizen or lawful  permanent resident of the United States,
shows intention to  become a citizen or a lawful permanent resident of the United States by sub-
mitting to the public university the student attends or plans to attend an official copy of the
student’s application to register with a federal immigration program or federal  deportation deferral
program or a statement of intent  that the student will seek to obtain citizenship as permitted under
federal law.
(3) A student who is a citizen or a lawful permanent resident of the  United States and who has
resided outside of Oregon for more than three years while serving  in the Armed Forces of the
United States, but who otherwise meets the requirements of subsection (1) or  (2) of this section,
shall qualify for exemption from nonresident tuition and fees for enrollment as an  undergraduate
student and a graduate student in  a degree program at a public university listed in ORS 352.002
without having to reestablish residency in Oregon.
(4) A student who  is a COFA islander and who has not previously established residence in any
state or  territory of the United States or the District of Columbia other than Oregon shall qualify
for exemption from nonresident  tuition and fees for enrollment as an undergraduate student and a
graduate student in a degree program at a public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(5) A student who is a refugee or special immigrant visa holder and who has not previously es-
tablished residence in any state or territory of the United States  or the District of Columbia other
than Oregon shall qualify for exemption from nonresident tuition and  fees for enrollment as an
undergraduate student and  a graduate student in a degree program at a public university listed in
ORS 352.002.
(6) The governing board shall adopt standards to implement the provisions of this section.
(7) Not later than July  1 of each year, the Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall
report to the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the President of  the Senate and the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly with subject matter authority over higher education, for  the
preceding academic year:
(a) The number of students that applied and were accepted  into public universities under sub-
sections (1) to (5) of this section; and
(b) The financial impact of subsections (1) to (5) of this section on public  universities listed in
ORS 352.002.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1522 (SB 1522-B) Page 4
(8) A student who is not a citizen or a lawful  permanent resident of the United States, or who
is a refugee, special immigrant visa  holder or COFA islander, is eligible to receive scholarships and
other financial aid from public universities listed in ORS 352.002.
(9) As used in this section:
(a) “COFA islander” means an individual who legally entered the  United States under a Com-
pact of Free Association treaty between the United States and any of the following countries:
(A) The Republic of Palau;
(B) The Republic of the Marshall Islands; or
(C) The Federated States of Micronesia.
(b) “Refugee” means  an individual who is granted refugee status for admission to the United
States by the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services.
(c) “Special immigrant visa holder” means :
(A) An  individual from Iraq or Afghanistan who was provided with the status of special immi-
grant by the United States Department of Homeland Security under:
[(A)] (i)  Section 1059(a) of the National  Defense Authorization Act for Fiscal Year 2006, P.L.
109-163, 119 Stat. 3444;
[(B)] (ii)  Section 1244(b) of the Refugee Crisis in Iraq Act of 2007, P.L. 110-181,  122 Stat. 397;
or
[(C)] (iii) Section 602(b) of the Afghan Allies Protection Act of 2009, P.L. 111-8, 123 Stat.  807[.];
or
(B) An individual who is granted humanitarian parole, asylum,  conditional permanent
residency or temporary protected status by the United States Department of  Homeland Se-
curity or other federal agency.
CONTACT-SHARING REQUIREMENT
FOR GRADUATE STUDENT EMPLOYEES
SECTION 4.
(1) Each public university listed in ORS 352.002 shall develop a  form for
graduate students enrolled at the public university who  wish to be employed by the public
university that:
(a) Requires the  graduate student to provide the contact information described in ORS
243.804 (4)(a)(B); and
(b) Waives any privacy  rights to, and authorizes the public university to disclose, the
information described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(2) As a condition of employment, any graduate student who  is employed by a public
university must:
(a) Provide the contact information described in subsection (1)(a) of this section; and
(b) Sign the consent described in subsection (1)(b) of this section to authorize  the public
university to release the contact information that is part of the employment record.
YOUTH CORRECTIONS EDUCATION PROGRAM AND
JUVENILE DETENTION EDUCATION PROGRAM
SECTION 5.
 ORS 329.451 is amended to read:
329.451. (1)(a) At or before grade 12, a school district  or public charter school shall award a
high school diploma to a student who completes the requirements established by subsection (2) of
this section.
(b) A school district or public charter school shall award a modified diploma to  a student who
satisfies the requirements established by subsection (7) of this section, an  extended diploma to a
student who satisfies the requirements established by subsection (8) of this section or an alternative
certificate to a student who satisfies the requirements established by subsection (9) of this section.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1522 (SB 1522-B) Page 5
(c) A school district or public charter school may not deny a student  who has the documented
history described in subsection (7)(b) or (8)(b) of this section the opportunity to  pursue a diploma
with more stringent requirements  than a modified diploma or an extended diploma for the sole rea-
son that the student has the documented history.
(d) A school district or public  charter school may award a modified diploma or extended diploma
to a student only upon receiving consent as provided by subsection (6) of this section.
(2)(a) In order to receive a  high school diploma from a school district or public charter school,
a student must satisfy the requirements established by the State  Board of Education and the school
district or public charter school and, while in grades 9 through 12, must complete at least:
(A) Twenty-four total credits;
(B) Three credits of mathematics; and
(C) Four credits of language arts.
(b) If a school  district or public charter school requires a student to complete more than 24 total
credits, as provided by paragraph (a)(A) of this subsection, the  school district or public charter
school may only require the student to complete additional credits for:
(A) Subjects for which the State Board of Education has  established academic content standards
under ORS 329.045;
(B) Courses provided as part of a career and technical education program; or
(C) Courses that provide, or qualify to provide, credit at post-secondary institutions of education.
(c)(A) A school district  or public charter school that requires students to satisfy any require-
ments not  specified by paragraph (a) of this subsection or by rule of the State Board of Education
must grant to a student  a waiver of the requirements established by the school district or public
charter school if the student is or, at any time from grade 9 to 12, was:
(i) A foster child, as defined in ORS 30.297;
(ii) Homeless, as determined under rules adopted by the State Board  of Education based on
standards adopted by the Department of Human Services;
(iii) A runaway, as determined under rules adopted by the State  Board of Education based on
standards adopted by the Department of Human Services;
(iv) A child in a military family covered by the Interstate Compact on Educational  Opportunity
for Military Children, as determined under rules adopted by the State Board of Education;
(v) A child of a migrant worker, as determined under rules adopted by the  State Board of Edu-
cation;  or
(vi) Enrolled in the Youth Corrections Education Program or the Juvenile Detention  Education
Program.
(B)(i) For any student identified under subparagraph (A) of this  paragraph, a school district or
public charter school must accept any credits earned by the student  in [ another school district or
public charter school ] an educational program in this state  and apply those credits toward re-
quirements specified by paragraph (a) of this subsection or by rule of the State Board of  Education
if the credits satisfied those requirements  in that [ other school district or public charter school. ] ed-
ucational program in this state.
(ii) As used in this  subparagraph, “educational program in this state” means an educa-
tional program that is:
(I) Provided by a school district, a  public charter school, the Youth Corrections Educa-
tion Program or the Juvenile Detention Education Program; or
(II) Funded as provided by ORS 343.243 for students in a long term care or treatment
facility described in ORS 343.961 or a hospital identified in ORS 343.261.
(3) A student providing work samples to demonstrate proficiency in  Essential Learning Skills
as may be required under subsection (2) of this section must be allowed to use  accommodations de-
scribed in the student’s individualized education program or the  student’s plan developed in ac-
cordance with section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C.  794. As used in this
subsection, the term “accommodations”:
(a) Includes, but is not limited to:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1522 (SB 1522-B) Page 6
(A) Additional time to demonstrate proficiency.
(B) The ability to demonstrate proficiency in an  alternative location that is secure and
proctored.
(C) The use of text-to-speech or speech-to-text technology or other assistive technology.
(b) Does not include  modifications that lower the proficiency standards or that are used solely
to earn modified credit.
(4) A student  may satisfy the requirements of subsection (2) of this section in less than four
years. If a student satisfies the requirements of subsection (2) of this  section and a school district
or public charter school has received consent as provided  by subsection (6) of this section, the
school district or public charter school shall award a high school diploma to the student.
(5) If a school district or  public charter school has received consent as provided by subsection
(6) of  this section, the school district or public charter school may advance the student to the next
grade level if the student has satisfied the requirements for the student’s current grade level.
(6)(a) For the  purpose of receiving consent as provided by subsections (1)(d), (4) and (5) of this
section, consent shall be provided by:
(A) The parent or guardian of the student, if the student:
(i) Is under 18 years of age and is not emancipated pursuant to ORS 419B.550 to 419B.558; or
(ii) Has been determined not to  have the ability to give informed consent regarding the student’s
education pursuant to a protective proceeding under ORS chapter 125; or
(B) The student, if the student is 18 years of  age or older or is emancipated pursuant to ORS
419B.550 to 419B.558.
(b) For  the purpose of awarding a modified diploma or extended diploma as provided by sub-
section (1)(d) of this section or of awarding a high school diploma as provided by subsection (4)  of
this section, consent must be  received during the school year for which the diploma will be awarded.
(7) A school district  or public charter school shall award a modified diploma only to students
who have  demonstrated the inability to meet the full set of academic content standards for a high
school diploma with reasonable modifications and accommodations. To be eligible for a  modified di-
ploma, a student must:
(a) Satisfy the  requirements for a modified diploma established by the State Board of Education;
and
(b) Have a documented history of an inability  to maintain grade level achievement due to sig-
nificant learning  and instructional barriers or have a documented history of a medical condition that
creates a barrier to achievement.
(8) A school district or public charter school shall award an extended diploma only  to students
who have  demonstrated the inability to meet the full set of academic content standards for a high
school diploma with reasonable modifications and accommodations. To be eligible for an  extended
diploma, a student must:
(a) While in grade nine through completion of high school, complete  12 credits, which may not
include more than six credits earned in a self-contained special education classroom  and shall in-
clude:
(A) Two credits of mathematics;
(B) Two credits of language arts;
(C) Two credits of science;
(D) Three credits of history, geography, economics or civics;
(E) One credit of health;
(F) One credit of physical education; and
(G) One credit of the arts or a world language; and
(b) Have a documented history of:
(A) An inability to  maintain grade level achievement due to significant learning and instruc-
tional barriers;
(B) A medical condition that creates a barrier to achievement; or
Enrolled Senate Bill 1522 (SB 1522-B) Page 7
(C) A change in the student’s ability to participate in grade  level activities as a result of a se-
rious illness or injury that occurred after grade eight.
(9) A school district or public charter school shall award an  alternative certificate to a student
who does not satisfy the requirements for  a high school diploma, a modified diploma or an extended
diploma if the student meets requirements established by the board of the school district  or public
charter school.
(10) A student shall have the opportunity to  satisfy the requirements of subsection (7), (8) or (9)
of this section by the later of:
(a) Four years after starting grade nine; or
(b) The student reaching the  age of 21 years, if the student is entitled to a public education until
the age of 21 years under state or federal law.
(11)(a) A student may satisfy the requirements described in subsection (7), (8) or (9)  of this sec-
tion in less than four years if consent  is provided in the manner described in subsection (6)(a) of this
section.
(b) The consent  provided under this subsection must be written and must clearly state that the
parent, guardian or student is  waiving the time allowed under subsection (10) of this section. A
consent may not be used to allow a student to satisfy the requirements of subsection  (7), (8) or (9)
of this section in less than three years.
(c) A copy of all consents provided under this  subsection for students in a school district must
be forwarded to the district superintendent.
(d) Each  school district must provide to the Superintendent of Public Instruction information
about the number of consents provided during a school year.
(12)(a) A student who qualifies to receive or receives a modified diploma, an extended  diploma
or an alternative certificate shall:
(A) Have the option of participating in a  high school graduation ceremony with the class of the
student; and
(B) Have access  to instructional hours, hours of transition services and hours of other services
that are designed to:
(i) Meet the unique needs of the student; and
(ii) When added together, provide a total number of hours of instruction  and services to the
student that equals at least the total number  of instructional hours that is required to be provided
to students who are attending a public high school.
(b)(A) The number of instructional hours, hours of  transition services and hours of other ser-
vices that are appropriate for a student  shall be determined by the student’s individualized educa-
tion program team. Based on the  student’s needs and performance level, the student’s individualized
education program team may decide that the student  will not access the total number of hours of
instruction and services to which the student has access under paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection.
(B) A school district may not unilaterally decrease  the total number of hours of instruction and
services to which the student has access under paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection, regardless of  the
age of the student.
(c) If a  student’s individualized education program team decides that the student will not access
the total number of hours  of instruction and services to which the student has access under para-
graph (a)(B) of this subsection, the school district shall annually:
(A) Provide the following information in writing to the parent or guardian of the student:
(i) The school district’s duty to comply with the requirements of paragraph (a)(B)  of this sub-
section; and
(ii) The prohibition against a school district’s unilaterally decreasing the total number of hours
of instruction and services to which the student has access.
(B) Obtain a signed acknowledgment from  the parent or guardian of the student that the parent
or guardian received the information described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1522 (SB 1522-B) Page 8
(C) Include in the individualized education program for  the student a written statement that
explains the reasons  the student is not accessing the total number of hours of instruction and ser-
vices to which the student has access under paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection.
(d) For purposes of paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection, transition  services and other services
designed to meet the unique needs of the student may be provided to  the student through an inter-
agency agreement entered  into by the school district if the individualized education program devel-
oped for the student indicates that the services  may be provided by another agency. A school
district that enters into  an interagency agreement as allowed under this paragraph retains the re-
sponsibility for ensuring that the student has access to the  number of service hours required to be
provided to the student under this subsection. An  agency is not required to change any eligibility
criteria or enrollment standards prior to entering into an interagency  agreement as provided by this
paragraph.
(13) A school district or public charter school shall:
(a) Ensure that students have on-site access to the appropriate  resources to achieve a high
school diploma, a modified diploma, an extended diploma or an alternative certificate at each high
school in the school district or at the public charter school.
(b) Provide literacy instruction to all students until graduation.
(c) Annually provide, to the parents or guardians of a student  who has the documented history
described in subsection (8)(b) of this section, information about the availability of a modified  di-
ploma, an extended diploma and an  alternative certificate and the requirements for the diplomas and
certificate:
(A) Beginning in grade five; or
(B) Beginning after a documented history described in subsection (8)(b) of this section has  been
established.
(14) A school district or public charter school  shall allow a student to participate in the high
school graduation ceremony with the class of the student and to wear:
(a) Native American items of cultural significance as provided by ORS 332.112; or
(b) A dress uniform issued to the student  by a branch of the Armed Forces of the United States
if the student:
(A) Qualifies to receive a high school  diploma, a modified diploma, an extended diploma or an
alternative certificate under this section; and
(B) Has completed  basic training for, and is an active member of, a branch of the Armed Forces
of the United States.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 329.451, as amended by section 1, chapter 175, Oregon Laws  2021, is amended
to read:
329.451. (1)(a) At or before grade 12, a  school district or public charter school shall award a
high school diploma to a student who completes the requirements established by subsection (2) of
this section.
(b) A school district  or public charter school shall award a modified diploma to a student who
satisfies the requirements established by  subsection (7) of this section, an extended diploma to a
student who satisfies the requirements established by subsection (8) of this section or an alternative
certificate to a student who satisfies the requirements established by subsection (9) of this section.
(c) A school district or  public charter school may not deny a student who has the documented
history described in subsection  (7)(b) or (8)(b) of this section the opportunity to pursue a diploma
with more stringent requirements than a modified diploma or an extended diploma for  the sole rea-
son that the student has the documented history.
(d) A school district or public  charter school may award a modified diploma or extended diploma
to a student only upon receiving consent as provided by subsection (6) of this section.
(2)(a) In order to receive a  high school diploma from a school district or public charter school,
a student must satisfy the requirements established by the State  Board of Education and the school
district or public charter school and, while in grades 9  through 12, must complete at least 24 total
credits, which must include at least:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1522 (SB 1522-B) Page 9
(A) Three credits of mathematics;
(B) Four credits of language arts; and
(C) One half-credit of civics.
(b) If a school  district or public charter school requires a student to complete more than 24 total
credits, as provided by paragraph (a) of this subsection, the school district or public charter school
may only require the student to complete additional credits for:
(A) Subjects for which the State Board of Education has  established academic content standards
under ORS 329.045;
(B) Courses provided as part of a career and technical education program; or
(C) Courses that provide, or qualify to provide, credit at post-secondary institutions of education.
(c)(A) A school district  or public charter school that requires students to satisfy any require-
ments not  specified by paragraph (a) of this subsection or by rule of the State Board of Education
must grant to a student  a waiver of the requirements established by the school district or public
charter school if the student is or, at any time from grade 9 to 12, was:
(i) A foster child, as defined in ORS 30.297;
(ii) Homeless, as determined under rules adopted by the State Board  of Education based on
standards adopted by the Department of Human Services;
(iii) A runaway, as determined under rules adopted by the State  Board of Education based on
standards adopted by the Department of Human Services;
(iv) A child in a military family covered by the Interstate Compact on Educational  Opportunity
for Military Children, as determined under rules adopted by the State Board of Education;
(v) A child of a migrant worker, as determined under rules adopted by the  State Board of Edu-
cation;  or
(vi) Enrolled in the Youth Corrections Education Program or the Juvenile Detention  Education
Program.
(B)(i) For any student identified under subparagraph (A) of this  paragraph, a school district or
public charter school must accept any credits earned by the student  in [ another school district or
public charter school ] an educational program in this state  and apply those credits toward re-
quirements specified by paragraph (a) of this subsection or by rule of the State Board of  Education
if the credits satisfied those requirements  in that [ other school district or public charter school. ] ed-
ucational program in this state.
(ii) As used in this  subparagraph, “educational program in this state” means an educa-
tional program that is:
(I) Provided by a school district, a  public charter school, the Youth Corrections Educa-
tion Program or the Juvenile Detention Education Program; or
(II) Funded as provided by ORS 343.243 for students in a long term care or treatment
facility described in ORS 343.961 or a hospital identified in ORS 343.261.
(3) A student providing work samples to demonstrate proficiency in  Essential Learning Skills
as may be required under subsection (2) of this section must be allowed to use  accommodations de-
scribed in the student’s individualized education program or the  student’s plan developed in ac-
cordance with section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C.  794. As used in this
subsection, the term “accommodations”:
(a) Includes, but is not limited to:
(A) Additional time to demonstrate proficiency.
(B) The ability to demonstrate proficiency in an  alternative location that is secure and
proctored.
(C) The use of text-to-speech or speech-to-text technology or other assistive technology.
(b) Does not include  modifications that lower the proficiency standards or that are used solely
to earn modified credit.
(4) A student  may satisfy the requirements of subsection (2) of this section in less than four
years. If a student satisfies the requirements of subsection (2) of this  section and a school district
Enrolled Senate Bill 1522 (SB 1522-B) Page 10
or public charter school has received consent as provided  by subsection (6) of this section, the
school district or public charter school shall award a high school diploma to the student.
(5) If a school district or public charter school has received  consent as provided by subsection
(6) of this section, the school district or public charter school may advance the student to the  next
grade level if the student has satisfied the requirements for the student’s current grade level.
(6)(a) For the purpose of receiving consent as provided by subsections (1)(d), (4) and (5)  of this
section, consent shall be provided by:
(A) The parent or guardian of the student, if the student:
(i) Is under 18 years of age and is not emancipated pursuant to ORS 419B.550 to 419B.558; or
(ii) Has been determined not to  have the ability to give informed consent regarding the student’s
education pursuant to a protective proceeding under ORS chapter 125; or
(B) The student, if the student is 18 years of  age or older or is emancipated pursuant to ORS
419B.550 to 419B.558.
(b) For the purpose of awarding a modified diploma or extended diploma as provided by  sub-
section  (1)(d) of this section or of awarding a high school diploma as provided by subsection (4) of
this section, consent must be  received during the school year for which the diploma will be awarded.
(7) A school district or public charter school shall award a modified diploma  only to students
who have demonstrated the inability to meet the full set of academic content standards for a  high
school diploma with  reasonable modifications and accommodations. To be eligible for a modified di-
ploma, a student must:
(a) Satisfy the  requirements for a modified diploma established by the State Board of Education;
and
(b) Have a documented history of an inability to  maintain grade level achievement due to sig-
nificant learning  and instructional barriers or have a documented history of a medical condition that
creates a barrier to achievement.
(8) A school  district or public charter school shall award an extended diploma only to students
who have demonstrated the inability to meet the full set of academic content standards for a  high
school  diploma  with reasonable modifications and accommodations. To be eligible for an extended
diploma, a student must:
(a) While in grade nine through  completion of high school, complete 12 credits, which may not
include more than six  credits earned in a self-contained special education classroom and shall in-
clude:
(A) Two credits of mathematics;
(B) Two credits of language arts;
(C) Two credits of science;
(D) Three credits of history, geography, economics or civics;
(E) One credit of health;
(F) One credit of physical education; and
(G) One credit of the arts or a world language; and
(b) Have a documented history of:
(A) An inability to maintain grade level achievement due to significant  learning and instruc-
tional barriers;
(B) A medical condition that creates a barrier to achievement; or
(C) A change in the student’s ability to participate  in grade level activities as a result of a se-
rious illness or injury that occurred after grade eight.
(9) A school district or public charter school shall award an  alternative certificate to a student
who does not satisfy the requirements for  a high school diploma, a modified diploma or an extended
diploma if the  student meets requirements established by the board of the school district or public
charter  school.
(10) A student shall have the opportunity to  satisfy the requirements of subsection (7), (8) or (9)
of this section by the later of:
(a) Four years after starting grade nine; or
Enrolled Senate Bill 1522 (SB 1522-B) Page 11
(b) The student reaching the  age of 21 years, if the student is entitled to a public education until
the age of 21 years under state or federal law.
(11)(a) A student may  satisfy the requirements described in subsection (7), (8) or (9) of this sec-
tion in less than four years if consent  is provided in the manner described in subsection (6)(a) of this
section.
(b) The consent provided under this subsection must be written and must clearly state  that the
parent, guardian or student is waiving the time allowed under subsection (10)  of this section. A
consent may not be used  to allow a student to satisfy the requirements of subsection (7), (8) or (9)
of this section in less than three years.
(c) A copy of all consents provided under this  subsection for students in a school district must
be forwarded to the district superintendent.
(d) Each school district must provide to the Superintendent of Public Instruction  information
about the number of consents provided during a school year.
(12)(a) A  student who qualifies to receive or receives a modified diploma, an extended diploma
or an alternative certificate shall:
(A) Have the option of participating in a  high school graduation ceremony with the class of the
student; and
(B) Have access to instructional hours, hours of transition services and hours of  other services
that are designed to:
(i) Meet the unique needs of the student; and
(ii) When added together, provide  a total number of hours of instruction and services to the
student that equals at least the total number of instructional  hours that is required to be provided
to students who are attending a public high school.
(b)(A) The number of instructional hours, hours of  transition services and hours of other ser-
vices that are appropriate for a student shall be  determined by the student’s individualized educa-
tion program team. Based on the  student’s needs and performance level, the student’s individualized
education program team may decide that the student will not  access the total number of hours of
instruction and services to which the student has access under paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection.
(B) A school district may not unilaterally decrease  the total number of hours of instruction and
services to which the student has access under paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection, regardless of  the
age of the student.
(c) If a  student’s individualized education program team decides that the student will not access
the total number of hours of instruction and services to which the student  has access under para-
graph (a)(B) of this subsection, the school district shall annually:
(A) Provide the following information in writing to the parent or guardian of the student:
(i) The school district’s  duty to comply with the requirements of paragraph (a)(B) of this sub-
section; and
(ii) The prohibition against a school district’s unilaterally decreasing the total number of hours
of instruction and services to which the student has access.
(B) Obtain a signed acknowledgment from  the parent or guardian of the student that the parent
or guardian received the information described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.
(C) Include in the individualized education program  for the student a written statement that
explains the reasons the student is not accessing the total number of hours of instruction  and ser-
vices to which the student has access under paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection.
(d) For purposes of paragraph  (a)(B) of this subsection, transition services and other services
designed to meet the unique needs  of the student may be provided to the student through an inter-
agency agreement entered into by the school district if the individualized education  program devel-
oped for the student indicates that the services may  be provided by another agency. A school
district that enters into an interagency agreement as allowed under this paragraph  retains the re-
sponsibility for ensuring that the student has access  to the number of service hours required to be
provided to the student under this subsection. An agency  is not required to change any eligibility
Enrolled Senate Bill 1522 (SB 1522-B) Page 12
criteria or enrollment standards prior to entering into an interagency  agreement as provided by this
paragraph.
(13) A school district or public charter school shall:
(a) Ensure that students have on-site  access to the appropriate resources to achieve a high
school diploma, a modified diploma, an extended diploma or an alternative certificate at each high
school in the school district or at the public charter school.
(b) Provide literacy instruction to all students until graduation.
(c) Annually provide, to the parents  or guardians of a student who has the documented history
described  in  subsection (8)(b) of this section, information about the availability of a modified di-
ploma, an extended diploma and an  alternative certificate and the requirements for the diplomas and
certificate:
(A) Beginning in grade five; or
(B) Beginning after a documented history described in subsection (8)(b) of this section has  been
established.
(14) A school district or public charter school shall allow  a student to participate in the high
school graduation ceremony with the class of the student and to wear:
(a) Native American items of cultural significance as provided by ORS 332.112; or
(b) A dress uniform issued to the student  by a branch of the Armed Forces of the United States
if the student:
(A) Qualifies to receive a high school diploma, a modified  diploma, an extended diploma or an
alternative certificate under this section; and
(B) Has completed  basic training for, and is an active member of, a branch of the Armed Forces
of the United States.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 326.700 is amended to read:
326.700. It is the purpose of ORS 326.712 and 327.026 and this section that  [ youths enrolled in
the Youth Corrections Education Program  and the Juvenile Detention Education Program administered
by the Department of Education be treated as nearly the same as practicable in the distribution  of the
State School Fund as children enrolled in common and union high school districts in this state. ]:
(1) Students who are enrolled in the  Youth Corrections Education Program, as defined
in ORS 326.695, or the Juvenile Detention Education Program,  as defined in ORS 326.695,
receive an appropriate education that is as nearly the same as practicable as the  education
that is received by students enrolled in common and union high school  districts in this state;
and
(2) Students who are enrolled, or  youth who had recently been enrolled, in the Youth
Corrections Education Program or the Juvenile Detention Education Program are  able to
smoothly transition from these programs into  school settings and workforce preparation
programs.
SECTION 8.  ORS 336.585 is amended to read:
336.585. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Juvenile Detention Education Program” means the program defined in ORS 326.695.
(b) “Resident district” means the school district in  which the parents or legal guardian, if any,
of a child resided at the time  of the child’s enrollment in the Juvenile Detention Education Program.
If the child has no parents or legal guardian, or none can be  located, the resident district is the
school district in which the child is physically located.
(2)(a) The Department of Education shall  provide or cause to be provided appropriate education
for children enrolled in an educational program under the  Juvenile Detention Education Program.
The Superintendent of Public Instruction  may contract with a school district or education service
district to provide or cause to be provided appropriate education to children enrolled in  an educa-
tional program under the  Juvenile Detention Education Program.  For the purpose of this section,
an appropriate education includes transition services from  the Juvenile Detention Education
Program into school settings and workforce preparation programs and any necessary ongo-
ing support for a transition.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1522 (SB 1522-B) Page 13
(b) An education service district that provides education as  provided by this subsection and that
awards high school diplomas:
(A) May  not impose requirements for a high school diploma that are in addition to the require-
ments prescribed by ORS 329.451 (2)(a) or by rule of the State Board of Education; and
(B) Must accept any credits previously earned by children  in another school or educational
program in this state and apply those credits toward the requirements prescribed by ORS  329.451
(2)(a) or by rule of the State Board of Education.
(3) The superintendent shall pay the costs of providing education to children enrolled  in an ed-
ucational program under the Juvenile Detention Education Program from the State  School Fund
grant allocated for that purpose under ORS 327.026.
(4) The State Board of Education shall adopt by  rule standards to be applied to the operation
of the Juvenile Detention Education Program, including standards that allow a school  district or
an education service district under contract with the superintendent to:
(a) Implement an assessment system as provided by ORS 329.485 [ (3)].
(b) Administer a nationally normed assessment as provided by ORS 329.488.
(c) Participate in the beginning  teacher and administrator mentorship program established by
ORS 329.788 to 329.820.
(d) Receive funds under ORS chapter 329.
(5) The superintendent shall ensure that  the resident district of each child enrolled in an edu-
cational program under the  Juvenile Detention Education Program is notified, if the resident district
can be reasonably identified. The purposes of the notification include, but are not limited to:
(a) Removing the child from the resident district’s census;
(b) Facilitating transfers of the child’s educational records; and
(c) Facilitating planning for the child’s possible return to the resident district.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 336.590 is amended to read:
336.590. (1) As used in this section, “Youth Corrections Education Program” means the program
defined in ORS 326.695.
(2) The Department of Education shall provide or cause to be  provided appropriate education
for children enrolled  in an educational program under the Youth Corrections Education Program.
The Superintendent of Public Instruction  may contract with a school district or education service
district to provide or cause to be provided appropriate education to children enrolled in  an educa-
tional program under the Youth Corrections Education Program.  For the  purpose of this section,
an appropriate education includes transition services from the Youth Corrections  Education
Program into school settings and workforce preparation programs and any necessary ongo-
ing support for a transition.
(3) The superintendent shall pay the costs of providing education to children enrolled  in an ed-
ucational program under the Youth  Corrections Education Program from the State School Fund
grant allocated for that purpose under ORS 327.026.
(4) The State Board of Education shall adopt by  rule standards to be applied to the operation
of the Youth Corrections Education Program, including standards that allow  a school district or an
education service district under contract with the superintendent to:
(a) Award high school diplomas, modified diplomas, extended diplomas and alternative  certif-
icates as provided by ORS 329.451 and 339.877. An education service  district that awards high
school diplomas as provided by this paragraph:
(A) May  not impose requirements for a high school diploma that are in addition to the require-
ments prescribed by ORS 329.451 (2)(a) or by rule of the State Board of Education; and
(B) Must accept any credits previously earned by children  in another school or educational
program in this state and apply those credits toward the requirements prescribed by ORS  329.451
(2)(a) or by rule of the State Board of Education.
(b) Implement an assessment system as provided by ORS 329.485 [ (3)].
(c) Administer a nationally normed assessment as provided by ORS 329.488.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1522 (SB 1522-B) Page 14
(d) Participate in the beginning teacher  and administrator mentorship program established by
ORS 329.788 to 329.820.
(e) Receive funds under ORS chapter 329.
SECTION 10.
(1) The  amendments to ORS 326.700, 336.585 and 336.590 by sections 7 to 9
of this 2022 Act become operative on July 1, 2022.
(2) The amendments to  ORS 326.700, 336.585 and 336.590 by sections 7 to 9 of this 2022
Act first apply to the 2022-2023 school year.
PROVISION OF MENSTRUAL PRODUCTS TO STUDENTS
SECTION 11.  ORS 326.545, as operative until July 1, 2022, is amended to read:
326.545. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Public education provider” means:
(A) A school district;
(B) A public charter school;
(C) An education service district;
(D) A community college; or
(E) A public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(b) “Public school building” means a building used by a public education provider  to provide
educational services to students.
(c) “Student  bathroom” means a bathroom that is accessible by students  in kindergarten or
above, including a gender-neutral bathroom, a bathroom designated for  females and a bathroom
designated for males.
(2)(a) Each public education  provider shall ensure that both tampons and sanitary pads are
available at no  cost to students through dispensers located in at least two student bathrooms of
every public school building.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this  subsection, if a public school building has only one
student bathroom, both tampons and sanitary pads must  be available at no cost to students through
dispensers located in that bathroom.
(3) A public education provider, and any employee of a public education provider, is  not liable
in a criminal action or for civil damages as a result of a student’s use of a tampon or  sanitary pad
made available under this section.
(4) The  State Board of Education and the Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall
adopt any rules necessary for  the administration of this section. Rules adopted by the board and
commission shall provide for:
(a) The number of dispensers required in each student bathroom;
(b) The types of products available in each student bathroom; [ and]
(c) The provision of tampons and sanitary pads in an alternate  location when the public
education provider does not have control of the student bathrooms used by the  students of
the public education provider;
(d) Modifications  to or exemptions from the requirements of this section for student
bathrooms that are not located in commonly accessible areas  of public school buildings of a
community college or a public university; and
[(c)] (e) Payments to public education providers for costs  incurred under this section, including:
(A) For school districts, public charter schools and education service districts  and subject to
subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, distributions from amounts available under ORS 327.008 (18)  to
be made based on the average daily membership, as defined  in ORS 327.006, of the district or school;
(B) For education service districts, distributions to be made as  provided by subparagraph (A)
of this paragraph may not exceed 7.5 percent of the amounts  available for distribution under ORS
327.008 (18);
(C) For community colleges, distributions from the Community College Support Fund to  be made
based on the full-time equivalent student enrollment of the community college; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 1522 (SB 1522-B) Page 15
(D) For public universities,  distributions from a public university support fund established by the
commission by rule.
SECTION 12.  ORS 326.545 is amended to read:
326.545. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Public education provider” means:
(A) A school district;
(B) A public charter school;
(C) An education service district;
(D) A community college; or
(E) A public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(b) “Public school building” means a building used by a public education provider  to provide
educational services to students.
(c) “Student  bathroom” means a bathroom that is accessible by students  in kindergarten or
above, including a gender-neutral bathroom, a bathroom designated for  females and a bathroom
designated for males.
(2) Each public education provider shall ensure that  both tampons and sanitary pads are avail-
able at no cost to students  through dispensers located in every student bathroom of every public
school building.
(3) A public  education provider, and any employee of a public education provider, is not liable
in a criminal  action or for civil damages as a result of a student’s use of a tampon or sanitary pad
made available under this section.
(4) The State Board of Education and the Higher Education Coordinating Commission  shall
adopt any rules necessary for the administration of this section. Rules adopted  by the board and
commission shall provide for:
(a) The number of dispensers required in each student bathroom;
(b) The types of products available in each student bathroom; [ and]
(c) The provision of tampons  and sanitary pads in an alternate location when the public
education provider does not have control of the student bathrooms used by the students of
the public education provider;
(d) Modifications to or exemptions from the requirements of this section for  student
bathrooms that are not  located in commonly accessible areas of the public school buildings
of a community college or a public university; and
[(c)] (e) Payments to public education providers for costs  incurred under this section, including:
(A) For school districts,  public charter schools and education service districts and subject to
subparagraph (B)  of this paragraph, distributions from amounts available under ORS 327.008 (18) to
be made based on the average daily membership, as defined  in ORS 327.006, of the district or school;
(B) For education service districts,  distributions to be made as provided by subparagraph (A)
of this paragraph may not exceed  7.5 percent of the amounts available for distribution under ORS
327.008 (18);
(C) For community colleges, distributions from the Community College Support Fund to  be made
based on the full-time equivalent student enrollment of the community college; and
(D) For public universities,  distributions from a public university support fund established by the
commission by rule.
PARTICIPATION IN INTERSCHOLASTIC ACTIVITIES
SECTION 13.
 ORS 339.460 is amended to read:
339.460. (1) As used in this section:
(a) [ “GED program” ] “High school equivalency program”  means a program provided [ by a
school district or an education service district ] to assist a student in earning a  certificate for pass-
ing an approved  high school equivalency test such as the  General Educational Development
(GED) [ certificate] test .
Enrolled Senate Bill 1522 (SB 1522-B) Page 16
(b) [ “GED student” ] “High school equivalency student”  means a student who is eligible to at-
tend school under ORS 339.115 (1) and who is enrolled in a [ GED] high school equivalency pro-
gram.
(c) “Homeschooled student” means a child who is taught by a private  teacher, a parent or a
legal guardian, as described in ORS 339.030.
(d) “Interscholastic activities” includes:
(A) For students in any grade from kindergarten through grade 12, athletics, music, speech  and
other similar or related activities.
(B) For students in any grade from kindergarten  through grade eight, activities that are offered
only before or after regular school hours and that may, but are not required  to, involve interaction
among other schools.
(e) “Public charter school” has the meaning given that term in ORS 338.005.
(2) A school district may not deny a [ GED] high school equivalency student, a  homeschooled
student or a student who attends  a public charter school that does not provide interscholastic ac-
tivities the opportunity to participate in  all interscholastic activities available in the school district
within the attendance boundaries in which the [ GED] high school equivalency  student,
homeschooled student or public charter school student  resides if the student fulfills the following
conditions, as applicable:
(a)(A) For a [ GED] high school equivalency  student or a homeschooled student, the student
must meet all school district eligibility requirements except:
(i) The school district’s school or class attendance requirements; and
(ii) The class requirements of the  voluntary association that administers the interscholastic ac-
tivity, if applicable.
(B) For a student who attends a public charter  school, the student must meet all school district
eligibility requirements except the school district’s school or class attendance requirements.
(b) For a homeschooled student  or a student who attends a public charter school, the student
must [meet] demonstrate academic eligibility by meeting  one of these requirements:
(A) Achieve  a minimum score that places the student at or above the 23rd percentile, based on
national norms, on an examination  from the list the State Board of Education adopts under ORS
339.035. The student must take the examination [ at the end of  each school year ] prior to the be-
ginning of the school year in which the student will  participate in an interscholastic activity
and for which academic eligibility is being determined , and the student’s parent or legal guard-
ian must submit the results to the school district for use in determining the student’s academic
eligibility [ for the following year ].
(B) Meet alternative  requirements that a school district adopts, in consultation with the
student’s parent or legal guardian,  to participate in interscholastic activities, including but not
limited to a requirement that a student submit  a portfolio of work samples to a school district
committee for review to determine whether the student  is eligible to participate in interscholastic
activities.
(c) For a [ GED] high school equivalency student,  the student must demonstrate academic el-
igibility by showing that, prior to beginning the interscholastic activity, the student has passed at
least one practice test administered through the [ GED] high school equivalency program.
(3)(a) In addition to the requirements set forth in  subsection (2) of this section, a public charter
school that enrolls a student who intends to participate  in an interscholastic activity must pay to
the school district or school that  offers the interscholastic activity, as appropriate and if the school
district or school requires payment as provided by this subsection:
(A) An annual fee that is  equivalent to not more than five percent of the amount of the school
district’s General Purpose Grant per ADMw, as calculated under ORS 327.013; and
(B) An additional annual fee  that is equivalent to not more than five percent of the amount of
the school district’s General Purpose Grant per  ADMw, as calculated under ORS 327.013, if partic-
ipating in the interscholastic activity requires the student to enroll in a course for credit.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1522 (SB 1522-B) Page 17
(b) The school district and the public  charter school shall enter into an agreement to specify the
amount of the fees described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(c) A public charter school is required to pay a fee described in paragraph (a) of this subsection
only once per year per student participating in an interscholastic activity at a school in  the school
district, regardless of the number of interscholastic activities in which the student participates.
(4) [ A GED ] A high school equivalency  student, a homeschooled student or a student who at-
tends a public charter school may participate  in interscholastic activities while awaiting examina-
tion or practice test results  unless the student is awaiting the results to restore academic
eligibility.
[(5) A GED student, a homeschooled  student or a student who attends a public charter school who
does not maintain academic eligibility  is ineligible to participate in interscholastic activities for the
duration of the school year in which the student becomes academically ineligible and for  the following
year. The student must take the required examinations or practice tests at the end of the second year
and meet  the standards described in subsection (2)(b) or (c) of this section to become eligible for the
third year.]
(5) A high school equivalency student, a homeschooled student or a student who  attends
a public charter school who does not maintain academic eligibility is ineligible to participate
in interscholastic activities for  the school year in which the student is determined to be ac-
ademically ineligible unless:
(a) At least 18 weeks have passed from the later of the date that the student:
(A) Was determined to have not maintained academic eligibility; or
(B) Became a high school equivalency student or a homeschooled student; and
(b) The student takes the required examinations or practice tests and  meets the stand-
ards described in subsection (2)(b) or (c) of this section.
(6)(a) A [ GED] high school equivalency student, a homeschooled  student or a student who at-
tends a public charter school must fulfill the  same responsibilities and standards of behavior and
performance, including related class or practice requirements, as  other students who participate in
the interscholastic  activity. The student must also comply with all public school requirements during
the time of participation.
(b) A student who attends a public charter school must be allowed to participate in an  inter-
scholastic activity in the same manner that a resident  of the school district may participate in the
interscholastic activity. A school district may not give priority to  residents of the school district to
participate in interscholastic activities, but may require a student who  attends a public charter
school to satisfy any standards for acceptance for participation.
(7) A [ GED] high school equivalency student, a homeschooled student or a student who attends
a public charter school who participates  in interscholastic activities must reside within the attend-
ance boundaries of the school at  which the student participates unless the school district has a
policy that allows any student attending a school of the school district to participate  in interscho-
lastic activities at any school of the school district.
SECTION 14.
 ORS 339.450 is amended to read:
339.450. A school, school district or association, whether public or private, may not deny  any
grade or high school  student the right to participate in interscholastic athletics solely on the ground
that the student:
(1) Transferred between schools;
(2) Attends a public charter school, as defined in ORS 338.005;
(3) Participated in athletics at another school; or
(4) Is eligible to attend  school under ORS 339.115 (1) and is enrolled in a program [ provided by
a school district or  an education service district to earn a General Educational Development (GED)
certificate] to earn a certificate for passing an approved high school equivalency test,  such as
the General Educational Development (GED) test .
PLAN TO ENSURE ACCESS TO EDUCATIONAL PROGRAMS
Enrolled Senate Bill 1522 (SB 1522-B) Page 18
AT CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES
SECTION 15. (1) The Department of Corrections shall develop a plan for  providing the
equipment, connectivity and infrastructure necessary to ensure that adults in custody in  the
Coffee Creek Correctional Facility and the Snake River Correctional Institution have online
access to:
(a) The adult basic skills development program described in ORS 421.084;
(b) The professional and technical program described in ORS 421.081; and
(c) Education programs  that provide college credit, a college degree, a college certif-
ication, an industry-recognized certification or license or an apprenticeship.
(2) The department shall submit the plan developed under  this section, in the manner
provided by ORS 192.245, to an interim committee  of the Legislative Assembly related to
education no later than December 31, 2022.
SECTION 16.
Section 15 of this 2022 Act is repealed on January 2, 2024.
SECTION 17. (1) No later than September 1, 2023,  the Department of Corrections shall
ensure that adults in custody in  the Coffee Creek Correctional Facility and the Snake River
Correctional Institution have online access to:
(a) The adult basic skills development program described in ORS 421.084;
(b) The professional and technical program described in ORS 421.081; and
(c) Education programs that provide college credit, a college degree, a  college certif-
ication, an industry-recognized certification or license or an apprenticeship.
(2) Nothing in this section establishes a legally enforceable right to  online access to the
programs described in this section for adults in custody.
(3) The department shall adopt any rules necessary for establishing program eligibility
and participation criteria for online access for adults in custody.
ELIGIBILITY FOR OREGON PROMISE GRANT
SECTION 18.
 ORS 341.522 is amended to read:
341.522. (1) The Office of  Student Access and Completion shall administer the Oregon Promise
program as provided by this section.
(2) Subject to subsections (7) to (10) of this section, the office shall provide  a grant for commu-
nity college courses to a  person who meets the criteria described in subsections (3) to (6) of this
section. The grant shall be limited as provided by subsections (7) to (10) of this section.
(3) A grant shall be awarded under this section to a person who meets the following criteria:
(a) Is enrolled in courses that are:
(A) Offered at a community college in this state; and
(B) Determined by the office, in accordance with rules adopted by the Higher Education Coor-
dinating Commission, to be required for completion of:
(i) A one-year curriculum for students who plan  to transfer to another post-secondary institution
of education;
(ii) An associate degree; or
(iii) A program in career and technical education;
(b) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, has been a  resident of this state for at
least 12 months prior to enrolling in the courses described in paragraph (a) of this subsection;
(c) Attained the person’s highest level of education, except as provided in subsection (5) of  this
section, in this state prior to:
(A) Receiving a diploma under ORS 329.451;
(B) Receiving a certificate for passing an  approved high school equivalency test such as the
General Educational Development (GED) test as provided by ORS 350.175;
(C) Completing grade 12 in compliance with the requirements of ORS 339.035; or
(D) Completing grade 12 at a private or parochial school, as described in ORS 339.030 (1)(a);
Enrolled Senate Bill 1522 (SB 1522-B) Page 19
(d) Except as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this section, attained  the person’s highest
level of education as described in paragraph (c) of this subsection  within six months from the date
that the person first enrolls in courses described  in paragraph (a) of this subsection for the purpose
of receiving a grant under this section;
(e) Earned a cumulative grade point average of [ 2.5] 2.0  or better in high school or otherwise
demonstrated an equivalent academic ability, as determined by the office according to rules adopted
by the commission;
(f) Completed and submitted the Free Application for Federal Student Aid for each  academic
year and accepted all state and federal aid  grants available to the person, if eligible to file the ap-
plication; and
(g) Has not completed either of the following:
(A) More than a total of 90 credit hours, or the equivalent, at a post-secondary institution  of
education; or
(B) A curriculum, degree or program, as described in paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection.
(4)(a) If a  person otherwise meets the required criteria and has been awarded a grant under
subsection (3) of  this section, but the person enters into service with a career and technical student
organization relating to agriculture or farming that is approved by the  Department of Education
under ORS 344.077 within six months after the person attained  the person’s highest level of educa-
tion as described in subsection (3)(c) of this section, the person will continue to be eligible to receive
the grant if the person first enrolls in courses described  in subsection (3)(a) of this section within
six months of finishing the person’s service with the career and technical student organization.
(b) In addition to the  situation described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the commission may
waive the requirement set forth in subsection (3)(d) of this section for a person who  shows that the
person was unable to timely enroll in courses described in subsection (3)(a) of this  section due to
a significant hardship. The commission may adopt rules to implement this paragraph.
(5)(a) A member of the Oregon  National Guard who has completed initial active duty training
is not required to comply with the criteria set forth in subsection (3)(d) of this section in order  to
receive a grant, provided that the member first enrolls in courses  described in subsection (3)(a) of
this section within  six months after completing initial active duty training, as evidenced by an offi-
cial form issued by the United States Department of Defense.
(b)(A) A person  who completes the highest level of education as described in subsection (3)(c)
of this section while confined in a correctional facility, either serving  a sentence of incarceration
or as  a young person, youth or adjudicated youth, is not required to comply with the criteria set
forth in subsection (3)(d) of  this section in order to receive a grant, provided that the person first
enrolls in courses described in  subsection (3)(a) of this section within six months after the date on
which the person is first released from  a correctional facility following completion of the highest
level of education described in subsection (3)(c) of this section.
(B) The eligibility requirements described in subsection (6)(a)(C) of this section may  be waived
by the office according to  rules adopted by the commission for a person who receives a grant under
this section in the manner described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.
(C) As used in this paragraph:
(i) “Adjudicated youth,” “detention facility,” “young person” and “youth” have  the meanings
given those terms in ORS 419A.004.
(ii) “Correctional facility” means any place used for  the confinement of young persons, youths
or adjudicated youths or persons charged with or convicted of a crime or otherwise  confined under
a court order, including a:
(I) Youth correction facility;
(II) Detention facility;
(III) Department of Corrections institution;
(IV) Local correctional facility; or
(V) State hospital or a secure intensive community inpatient facility, with respect  to persons
detained therein who are youths or adjudicated  youths, who are charged with or convicted of a
Enrolled Senate Bill 1522 (SB 1522-B) Page 20
crime or who are detained therein  after having been found guilty except for insanity of a crime
under ORS 161.290 to 161.373 or having been  found responsible except for insanity under ORS
419C.411.
(iii) “Department of Corrections institution” has the meaning given that term in ORS 421.005.
(iv) “Local correctional facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 169.005.
(v) “Youth correction facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 420.005.
(c)(A) If a person was a foster child:
(i) The person shall be treated as meeting the residency criteria for  eligibility under subsection
(3)(b) of  this section if, but for the person’s placement in out-of-state foster care, the person other-
wise meets the requirements of subsection (3)(b) of this section.
(ii) The person shall be treated as attaining the person’s  highest level of education in this state
under subsection (3)(c) of this section if the person attained  the person’s highest level of education
while placed in out-of-state foster care and the person’s  highest level of education substantially
meets the requirements under subsection (3)(c) of this section.
(iii) The person is not required to comply with the criteria  set forth in subsection (3)(d) of this
section in order to receive a grant provided that  the person completes the highest level of education
as described in subparagraph (A)(ii) of this paragraph while in a treatment program and  the person
first enrolls in courses described in subsection (3)(a) of this section within 12  months after the date
on which the person is released from the treatment program.
(B) Upon request from the commission, the Department of Human  Services shall provide doc-
umentation of the placement status of a person described in paragraph (c)(A) of this subsection.
(C) As used in this paragraph:
(i) “Foster care” means substitute care for children placed by  the Department of Human Ser-
vices or a tribal child welfare agency away from the child’s parents and for whom the department
or agency has placement and care responsibility, including placements in foster family homes, foster
homes of relatives, group homes, emergency shelters, residential facilities, child care institutions and
preadoptive homes.
(ii) “Foster  child” means a child over whom the Department of Human Services retained juris-
diction under ORS 417.200 for the duration of the child’s placement in foster care outside  the State
of Oregon.
(6)(a) A person continues to remain  eligible to receive a grant under this section if the person,
in addition to satisfying the criteria specified in subsection (3) of this  section, meets the following
criteria:
(A) Maintains at least the minimum cumulative grade point average prescribed by  the commis-
sion based on federal aid grant requirements;
(B) Makes satisfactory  academic progress toward a curriculum, degree or program, as described
in subsection (3)(a)(B) of this section, as prescribed by the commission based on federal aid  grant
requirements; and
(C) Enrolls in courses described in subsection (3)(a) of this  section for a sufficient number of
credit hours to be considered at least a  half-time student each term for at least three terms in each
consecutive academic year .[; and ]
[(D) Completes a  first-year experience, as identified by the community college and reported by the
community college to the commission. ]
(b) A person who fails to meet an eligibility  requirement described in paragraph (a) of this
subsection becomes ineligible to receive a grant under  this section for the term after which the
person fails to meet  the eligibility requirement, unless the eligibility requirement is waived by the
office according to rules adopted by the commission.
(7)(a) The total amount of a grant awarded under this section shall be based on each term that
a person is enrolled  in courses described in subsection (3)(a) of this section. Except as provided in
subsections (9) and (10) of  this section, after the amount of tuition for the person for the term is
reduced by any amounts received by the person in state and federal aid grants, the person shall be
eligible for a grant under this section in an amount that equals:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1522 (SB 1522-B) Page 21
(A) Except as provided by [ paragraphs] paragraph (b) [ and (c) ] of this subsection,  not less than
the greater of:
(i) [ $1,000] $2,000, adjusted for inflation based on the increase of the average cost of tui-
tion at a community college operated under  ORS chapter 341 in a manner determined by the
commission by rule ; and
(ii) The person’s actual cost for tuition.
(B) Not more than the lesser of:
(i) The average cost of tuition at a  community college in this state, as determined by the office;
and
(ii) The person’s actual cost for tuition.
[(b) The amount of a grant, as calculated under paragraph (a) of this subsection, shall  be reduced
by $50 for each term that the person receives a grant under this section. ]
[(c)(A) ] (b)(A)  If the office determines both that the person’s actual cost for  tuition exceeds the
amount set  forth in paragraph (a)(A)(i) of this subsection and that the person’s actual cost for tuition
exceeds the average cost  of tuition at a community college in this state, the person shall be eligible
for a grant in  an amount that equals the average cost of tuition at a community college in this state.
(B) If the office determines that the person’s actual cost for tuition is less than  the amount set
forth in paragraph (a)(A)(i)  of this subsection, the person shall be eligible for a grant in an amount
that equals the amount set forth in paragraph (a)(A)(i) of this subsection.
[(d)] (c)  The minimum amount of a grant, as  calculated under paragraphs (a) [ to (c) ] and (b)  of
this subsection, may be prorated for a person who is enrolled in courses described in subsection
(3)(a) of  this section for a sufficient number of credit hours to be considered at least a half-time
student but not a full-time student.
[(e)] (d) The commission may prescribe by rule whether to  include fees, and any limitations re-
lated to the inclusion of fees, when determining  the actual cost of tuition or the average cost of
tuition under this subsection.
(8) The commission may adopt by rule the priority by which grants are awarded, which may
allow for preference to be given to persons enrolled in school districts or high  schools that meet
specified criteria.
(9) Prior to the start of the fall term of each academic year,  the commission shall determine
whether there are sufficient moneys to award a grant under this section to each person  who meets
the criteria described in subsections (3) to  (6) of this section. When making a determination un-
der this  subsection, the commission may consider both projected resources and statutory
modifications that will take effect during the  current biennium.  On the basis of this determi-
nation the commission may:
(a) Limit eligibility to receive a grant under this section to a  person whose [ family
contribution] financial resources , as determined by the commission by rule, [ is] are at or below  the
level the commission determines is necessary  to allow the commission to operate the Oregon
Promise program with available moneys; or
(b) Reduce or eliminate any limitation on eligibility  previously imposed by the commission under
paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(10)(a) If at any time  the commission determines that there are insufficient moneys to provide
a grant to each person who has been awarded a grant under this section, the commission may[ :]
[(A)] decrease the total amount of the grant awarded .[; or ]
[(B) Increase  the amount that a person must pay under subsection (7)(b) of this section for each
term that the person receives a grant under this section. ]
(b) If at any time the commission determines that the  amount of moneys available to operate the
Oregon Promise program exceeds the amount determined under  subsection (9) of this section, the
commission may reduce or eliminate any limitation on eligibility to receive  a grant under this sec-
tion that was previously imposed by the commission under subsection (9)(a) of this section.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1522 (SB 1522-B) Page 22
(c) The commission shall promptly notify the interim committees  of the Legislative Assembly
responsible for higher education each time the commission takes any action under paragraph (a)  or
(b) of this subsection.
(11) The commission shall adopt any rules necessary for the  administration of this section, in-
cluding any requirements related to:
(a) Specifying the form and  timelines for submitting an application for a grant under this sec-
tion;
(b) Determining whether a person is eligible for a grant  under this section, including whether
the person shall be given priority as allowed under subsection (8) of this section;
(c) Implementing programs or policies that improve  the academic success or completion rates
for persons who receive a grant under this section;
(d) Prescribing eligibility requirements and grant calculations for persons dually enrolled in  a
community college and a public university; and
(e) Evaluating the  impact of the program established under this section, including any require-
ments for reporting data needed for evaluations.
(12) No later than December 31 of each even-numbered year, the commission shall  submit to an
interim legislative committee related to education a  report that summarizes the commission’s
findings on the impact of the program established under this section. The report shall include:
(a) Student completion rates of curricula, degrees and programs described in subsection  (3)(a)(B)
of this section;
(b) The amount of federal aid grants received by persons who received a grant under this sec-
tion;
(c) The financial impact of the program on school  districts that had students receive a grant
under this section;
(d) The financial impact and the enrollment impact of the program on community  colleges and
public universities in this state; and
(e) The overall success rate of the program and financial impact of the program.
SECTION 19.
The amendments to ORS 341.522 by section 18  of this 2022 Act first apply
to the 2022-2023 academic year.
PHYSICAL EDUCATION REQUIREMENTS
SECTION 20.  ORS 329.496 is amended to read:
329.496. (1) Every public school  student in kindergarten through grade eight shall participate in
physical education for the entire school year.
(2)(a) Students in kindergarten through grade five, and students in grade  six at a school that
teaches kindergarten through grade  six, shall participate in physical education for at least 150
minutes during each school week.
(b) Except as provided by paragraph (a) of this subsection, students in grades six through  eight
shall participate in physical education for at least 225 minutes during each school week.
(c) Notwithstanding the time requirements established by paragraphs (a) and (b) of this  sub-
section, the State Board of Education shall adopt rules that prorate the time requirements for:
(A) School weeks with scheduled  school closures, including closures for holidays, inservice days
and days scheduled for parent-teacher conferences;
(B) School weeks with unscheduled  school closures, including closures for inclement weather
and emergencies;
(C) School weeks with out-of-school activities  that occur during usual school hours, including
field trips and outdoor school programs;
(D) Part-time school programs, including half-day kindergarten; and
(E) Irregular class schedules, including class schedules based on a four-day week.
(d) School  districts and public charter schools are not required to comply with the time re-
quirements established by paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection for school years during the
Enrolled Senate Bill 1522 (SB 1522-B) Page 23
biennium in which the total amounts  appropriated or allocated to the State School Fund and avail-
able for distribution to school  districts are less than the amounts determined to be needed for school
districts through the State School Fund under  the tentative budget prepared as provided by ORS
291.210. After the beginning of a biennium, a school district  or a public charter school may cease
to comply with the time requirements established by paragraphs (a) and (b)  of this subsection if the
amounts appropriated or allocated to the State School Fund and  available for distribution to school
districts are less than the amounts determined to  be needed for distribution through the State
School Fund, as calculated under ORS 291.210.
(3) School districts and public  charter schools shall offer instruction in physical education that
meets the academic content standards for physical education adopted by the  State Board of Educa-
tion under ORS 329.045. The instruction shall be  a sequential, developmentally appropriate curric-
ulum that is designed,  implemented and evaluated to help students develop the knowledge, motor
skills, self-management skills, attitudes and confidence needed to adopt and maintain  physical ac-
tivity throughout their lives.
(4)(a) School districts and public charter schools shall devote at  least 50 percent of physical
education class time to actual physical activity in each school  week, with as much class time as
possible spent in moderate physical activity.
(b)(A) For the purpose of satisfying the time requirements established by subsection  (2) of this
section, school districts and public charter schools may provide  up to 45 minutes of activities during
each school week that:
(i) Meet the academic content standards for physical  education adopted by the State Board of
Education under ORS 329.045;
(ii) Are provided for students by a teacher whose license allows the teacher to provide instruc-
tion in physical education to those students, even if the  teacher does not have a physical education
endorsement; and
(iii) Have been reviewed by a licensed teacher with a physical education endorsement.
(B) The Department of Education shall:
(i) Review and,  as appropriate, approve activities that are developed by nonprofit professional
organizations  representing  health and physical education educators if the activities meet the re-
quirements of subparagraph (A) of this paragraph; and
(ii) Make available to school districts and  public charter schools a list of activities approved
as provided by this subparagraph.
(C) School  districts and public charter schools may provide activities that meet the requirements
of subparagraph (A)  of this paragraph even if the activities are not approved as provided by sub-
paragraph (B) of this paragraph.
(5)(a) Notwithstanding subsections (1), (2) and (4) of this section, a student  with disabilities shall
have suitably adapted physical education  incorporated as part of the individualized education pro-
gram developed for the student under ORS 343.151.
(b) Notwithstanding subsections (1), (2) and (4) of this section, a  student who does not have an
individualized education program but  has chronic health problems, other disabling conditions or
other special needs that preclude the student from  participating in regular physical education in-
struction shall have suitably adapted physical education incorporated as  part of an individualized
health plan developed for the student by the school district or public charter school.
(6) School districts and public charter schools shall assess school curricula at regular intervals
to measure the attainment of the minimum number of  minutes that students are required to partic-
ipate in physical education under this section.
(7)(a) All teachers of physical education for public  school students in kindergarten through
grade eight shall be adequately prepared and shall regularly participate in professional  development
activities to effectively deliver the physical education program.
(b)(A) Notwithstanding any licensing  or endorsement requirements established by the Teacher
Standards and Practices Commission, a teacher with an elementary multiple  subject endorsement
Enrolled Senate Bill 1522 (SB 1522-B) Page 24
may instruct students in activities described in subsection  (4)(b) of this section if the activities are
reviewed by a licensed teacher with a physical education endorsement.
(B) A teacher described  in this paragraph may provide instruction in activities described in
subsection (4)(b) of this section to students who are not regularly taught  by the teacher as long as
the instruction in the activities to students who are not regularly taught by  the teacher does not
exceed 45 minutes during each school week. Nothing in this subparagraph allows  a school district
to employ a teacher  for the sole purpose of providing instruction in activities described in sub-
section (4)(b) of this section.
(8) A school district that does not comply with the requirements of this section  is considered
to be nonstandard under ORS 327.103.
(9)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (8) of this section and pursuant to  rules adopted by the
State Board of Education, the Superintendent of  Public Instruction may grant a waiver of
the requirements of this section to a school  district or a public charter school if the super-
intendent finds that the  school district or public charter school is unable to meet the re-
quirements because of a human-created disaster or a natural disaster.
(b) A waiver granted under this subsection may be:
(A) In whole or in part of the requirements prescribed by this section; and
(B) Granted for only one school year, but may be renewed for subsequent school years
based on  rules adopted by the board if the school district or public charter school continues
to be impacted by the disaster.
SECTION 21.
(1) The amendments to ORS 329.496 by section 20 of this 2022 Act first apply
to the 2020-2021 school year.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 329.496 or section 2, chapter 301, Oregon Laws 2017, a school
district may not be considered to be nonstandard for failure to comply with the  provisions
of ORS 329.496 or section 2, chapter 301, Oregon Laws 2017, if the school district receives a
waiver as provided by ORS 329.496 (9).
LOCATIONS OF MARIJUANA RETAILERS
SECTION 22.  ORS 475C.097 is amended to read:
475C.097. (1) The retail sale of marijuana items is subject to  regulation by the Oregon Liquor
and Cannabis Commission.
(2) A marijuana  retailer must have a retail license issued by the commission for the premises
at which marijuana items are sold. To hold a retail license under this section, a marijuana retailer:
(a) Must apply for a license in the manner described in ORS 475C.033;
(b) Must provide proof that the applicant is 21 years of age or older;
(c) May not be located in an area that is zoned exclusively for residential use;
(d) Except as provided in ORS 475C.101, may not be located within 1,000 feet of:
(A) A building where a public prekindergarten  or kindergarten program is provided by a
school district or an education service district;
[(A)] (B) A  public elementary or secondary school for which attendance is compulsory under
ORS 339.020; or
[(B)] (C) A private or parochial elementary or secondary school, teaching  children as described
in ORS 339.030 (1)(a); and
(e) Must meet the requirements of any rule adopted by the commission under subsection (3) of
this section.
(3) The commission shall adopt rules that:
(a) Require a marijuana retailer to annually renew a license issued under this section;
(b) Establish application, licensure and renewal of licensure fees for marijuana retailers;
(c) Require marijuana items sold by a marijuana retailer to be tested  in accordance with ORS
475C.544;
Enrolled Senate Bill 1522 (SB 1522-B) Page 25
(d) Notwithstanding ORS 475C.205, allow a marijuana retailer to deliver marijuana items to an-
other marijuana retailer that  has on the marijuana retailer’s license application a person that has
an interest in or authority over the management of the other marijuana retailer;
(e) Subject to the  limitations and privileges described in ORS 475C.149 (3), allow a marijuana
retailer  registered  under ORS 475C.149 to sell medical grade cannabinoid products, cannabinoid
concentrates and cannabinoid extracts at retail in the same manner that rules adopted under  ORS
475C.005 to 475C.525 allow a marijuana retailer to  sell general use cannabinoid products,
cannabinoid concentrates and cannabinoid extracts at retail, excepting  those circumstances where
differentiating between the sale of medical grade cannabinoid products,  cannabinoid concentrates
and cannabinoid extracts and the sale of general use cannabinoid products, cannabinoid concen-
trates and cannabinoid extracts is necessary to protect the public health and safety; and
(f) Require  a marijuana retailer to meet any public health and safety standards and industry best
practices established by the commission by rule.
(4) Fees adopted under subsection (3)(b) of this section:
(a) May not exceed, together with other fees collected under ORS  475C.005 to 475C.525, the cost
of administering ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525; and
(b) Shall be deposited in the Marijuana  Control and Regulation Fund established under ORS
475C.297.
SECTION 23.
 ORS 475C.101 is amended to read:
475C.101. Notwithstanding ORS 475C.097 (2)(d), a marijuana retailer may  be located within 1,000
feet of a [ school] building described in ORS 475C.097 (2)(d) if:
(1)(a) The marijuana retailer is not located within 500 feet of:
(A) A building where a public prekindergarten  or kindergarten program is provided by a
school district or an education service district;
[(A)] (B) A  public elementary or secondary school for which attendance is compulsory under
ORS 339.020; or
[(B)] (C) A private or parochial elementary or secondary school, teaching  children as described
in ORS 339.030 (1)(a); and
(b) The Oregon Liquor and  Cannabis Commission determines that there is a physical or ge-
ographic barrier capable of  preventing children from traversing to the premises of the marijuana
retailer; or
(2) The marijuana retailer was established before August 1, 2017, in accordance with a city  or
county ordinance adopted under section 29b, chapter 83, Oregon Laws 2016.
SECTION 24.
 ORS 475C.105 is amended to read:
475C.105. If a [ school] building described in ORS 475C.097 (2)(d) that  has not previously been
attended by children is established within 1,000 feet of a premises for which a license has  been is-
sued under ORS 475C.097, the marijuana retailer located at that  premises may remain at that lo-
cation unless the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission revokes  the license of the marijuana
retailer under ORS 475C.265.
SECTION 25.  ORS 475C.833 is amended to read:
475C.833. (1)(a) The Oregon Health  Authority shall establish by rule a medical marijuana
dispensary registration system for the purpose of tracking and regulating the transfer of:
(A) Usable marijuana, immature marijuana plants and seeds from registry  identification
cardholders, designated primary caregivers and persons responsible  for marijuana grow sites to
medical marijuana dispensaries;
(B) Medical  cannabinoid products, cannabinoid concentrates and cannabinoid extracts from
persons responsible for marijuana processing sites to medical marijuana dispensaries; and
(C) Usable marijuana,  immature marijuana plants, seeds, medical cannabinoid products,
cannabinoid concentrates and cannabinoid extracts from medical marijuana dispensaries to registry
identification cardholders and designated primary caregivers.
(b) A person may not operate  an establishment for the purpose of providing the services de-
scribed in paragraph (a) of this subsection unless the person is registered under this section.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1522 (SB 1522-B) Page 26
(2) The registration system established  under subsection (1) of this section must require an ap-
plicant for a medical marijuana dispensary to submit an application to the authority that includes:
(a) The name of the individual who owns the  medical marijuana dispensary or, if a business
entity owns  the medical marijuana dispensary, the name of each individual who has a financial in-
terest in the medical marijuana dispensary;
(b) The name of the individual or individuals  responsible for the medical marijuana dispensary,
if different from the name of the individual who owns the medical marijuana dispensary;
(c) The address of the medical marijuana dispensary;
(d) Proof that each individual responsible for the medical marijuana dispensary is 21  years of
age or older;
(e) Documentation, as required  by the authority by rule, that demonstrates the medical
marijuana dispensary meets the requirements of subsection (3) of this section; and
(f) Any other information that the authority considers necessary.
(3) To qualify for registration under this section, a medical marijuana dispensary:
(a) May not be located in an area that is zoned for residential use;
(b) May not be located at the same address as a marijuana grow site;
(c) Must be registered as a business, or have  filed an application to register as a business, with
the office of the Secretary of State;
(d) Except as provided under ORS 475C.840, may not be located within 1,000 feet of:
(A) A building where a public prekindergarten or  kindergarten program is provided by a
school district or an education service district;
[(A)] (B) A public elementary or secondary school for which attendance is  compulsory under
ORS 339.020; or
[(B)] (C) A private or parochial elementary or secondary school, teaching  children as described
in ORS 339.030 (1)(a);
(e) Must not be located within 1,000 feet of another medical marijuana dispensary; and
(f) Must  meet the requirements of any rule adopted by the authority under subsection (10) of this
section.
(4)(a) The authority shall conduct a criminal records check under ORS 181A.195 for  each indi-
vidual named in an application submitted under subsection (2) of this section.
(b) An individual convicted for the  manufacture or delivery of a controlled substance in Sched-
ule I or Schedule II may not own or  be responsible for a medical marijuana dispensary for two years
from the date the individual is convicted.
(c) An individual convicted more than  once for the manufacture or delivery of a controlled
substance in Schedule I or Schedule  II may not own or be responsible for a medical marijuana
dispensary.
(5) If a person submits the application required under subsection (2)  of this section, if the med-
ical marijuana dispensary identified in the  application meets the requirements of this section and
any rules adopted  under this section and if each individual named in the application passes the
criminal records check required under subsection  (4) of this section, the authority shall register the
medical marijuana dispensary and issue proof of registration.  Proof of registration must be displayed
on the premises of the medical marijuana dispensary at all times.
(6) A medical marijuana dispensary that is registered  under this section is not required to reg-
ister with the State Board of Pharmacy under ORS 475.125.
(7) The  individual or individuals responsible for a medical marijuana dispensary shall maintain
documentation of each transfer of usable marijuana, medical cannabinoid products, cannabinoid
concentrates, cannabinoid extracts, immature marijuana plants and seeds.
(8) The authority may inspect:
(a) The premises of a proposed medical marijuana dispensary or a  registered medical marijuana
dispensary to ensure compliance with this section and  ORS 475C.843 and any rules adopted under
this section or ORS 475C.843; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 1522 (SB 1522-B) Page 27
(b) The records  of a registered medical marijuana dispensary to ensure compliance with sub-
section (7) of this section.
(9) Subject to the provisions  of ORS chapter 183, the authority may refuse to register an appli-
cant under this section or may suspend  or revoke the registration of a medical marijuana dispensary
if the authority determines that the applicant, the owner of  the medical marijuana dispensary, a
person responsible for  the medical marijuana dispensary, or an employee of the medical marijuana
dispensary, violated  a provision of ORS 475C.770 to 475C.919, a rule adopted under ORS 475C.770
to 475C.919 or an ordinance adopted pursuant to ORS 475C.897.
(10) The authority shall adopt rules to implement this section, including rules that:
(a) Require a registered  medical marijuana dispensary to annually renew the registration for
that dispensary;
(b) Establish fees  for registering, and renewing the registration of, a medical marijuana
dispensary;
(c) Require that each medical marijuana dispensary  install and maintain a minimum security
system that includes video surveillance, an alarm system and a safe;
(d) Require that usable marijuana,  medical cannabinoid products, cannabinoid concentrates,
cannabinoid extracts and immature marijuana plants transferred by  a medical marijuana dispensary
be tested to ensure the public health and safety; and
(e) Impose any  other standard on the operation of a medical marijuana dispensary to ensure the
public health and safety.
SECTION 26.
 ORS 475C.840 is amended to read:
475C.840. Notwithstanding ORS 475C.833 (3)(d), a  medical marijuana dispensary may be located
within 1,000 feet of a [ school] building described in ORS 475C.833 (3)(d) if:
(1)(a) The medical marijuana dispensary is not located within 500 feet of:
(A) A building where a public prekindergarten or  kindergarten program is provided by a
school district or an education service district;
[(A)] (B) A public elementary or secondary school for which attendance is  compulsory under
ORS 339.020; or
[(B)] (C) A private or parochial elementary or secondary school, teaching  children as described
in ORS 339.030 (1)(a); and
(b) The  Oregon Health Authority determines that there is a physical or geographic barrier ca-
pable of preventing children from traversing to the premises of the medical  marijuana dispensary;
or
(2) The medical marijuana dispensary was established before August 1, 2017, in accordance with
a city or county ordinance adopted under section 29, chapter 83, Oregon Laws 2016.
SECTION 27.
 ORS 475C.847 is amended to read:
475C.847. If a [ school] building described in ORS 475C.833 (3)(d) that  has not previously been
attended by children is established within 1,000 feet of a medical  marijuana dispensary, the medical
marijuana dispensary may  remain at its current location unless the Oregon Health Authority re-
vokes the registration of the medical marijuana dispensary.
SECTION 28. The amendments to ORS 475C.097, 475C.101, 475C.105,  475C.833, 475C.840 and
475C.847 by sections 22 to 27 of this 2022 Act become operative on January 1, 2023.
PERS FOR PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOL MEMBERS
SECTION 29.  ORS 338.135 is amended to read:
338.135. (1) Employee assignment to a public charter school shall be voluntary.
(2)(a) A public charter school or the sponsor of the public charter  school is considered the em-
ployer of any employees of the public charter school. If  a school district board is not the sponsor
of the public charter school, the school district board may not be the employer of the employees of
the public charter school and the school district board may not collectively bargain with  the em-
Enrolled Senate Bill 1522 (SB 1522-B) Page 28
ployees of the public charter school. The public  charter school governing body shall control the
selection of employees at the public charter school.
(b) If a virtual public charter school or the sponsor of a virtual public  charter school contracts
with a for-profit entity to provide educational services through the  virtual public charter school, the
for-profit entity may not be the employer of any employees of the  virtual public charter school un-
less:
(A) The employee is an administrator who does not have any teaching responsibilities; and
(B) Both the  executive officer of the sponsor and the public charter school governing body ap-
prove employment by the for-profit entity. The executive officer or governing body may  choose to
grant approval under this subparagraph:
(i) For all employees of the  for-profit entity who meet the description in subparagraph (A) of this
paragraph;
(ii) Based on the job categories of the employees who meet the description in subparagraph  (A)
of this paragraph; or
(iii) On a case-by-case basis for each employee who  meets the description in subparagraph (A)
of this paragraph.
(3) The  school district board of the school district within which the public charter school is lo-
cated shall grant a leave of absence to any employee  who chooses to work in the public charter
school. The length and terms of the leave of absence  shall be set by negotiated agreement or by
board policy. However, the length of the leave of absence may not be less than two years unless:
(a) The charter of the public charter school is terminated or the public charter school  is dis-
solved or closed during the leave of absence; or
(b) The employee and the school district board have mutually agreed to a  different length of
time.
(4) An employee of  a public charter school operating within a school district who is granted a
leave of absence from the school district and  returns to employment with the school district shall
retain seniority and benefits as an employee pursuant to the terms of the leave  of absence.
Notwithstanding ORS 243.650 to 243.809, a  school district that was the employer of an employee of
a public charter school not operating within the school district may make provisions for  the return
of the employee to employment with the school district.
(5)(a) For purposes of ORS chapters 238 and 238A, a public charter school shall  be considered
a public employer and as such shall participate in the Public Employees Retirement System.
(b) For purposes of determining the salary paid [ between August 29, 2003,  and January 1, 2020,
to a ] to an active  member of the Public Employees Retirement System under ORS 238A.005  (17)
during the period between August 29, 2003, and January 1, 2020 , remuneration paid to a member
in return for services to a public charter school is deemed includable in the  member’s taxable in-
come under Oregon law during a period of continuous  employment with any public charter school
if:
(A) The member was hired in a qualifying position by  any public charter school on or after
August 29, 2003;
(B) The member  was informed in writing by the public charter school during the period
of continuous employment that  the member was eligible to participate in the Public Em-
ployees Retirement System  and the public charter school made contributions to the system
on the member’s behalf;
[(B)] (C) The remuneration was,  or would have been if the member were an Oregon resident,
includable in the  member’s taxable income under Oregon law during the period of continuous em-
ployment; and
[(C)] (D) The member resided and performed services  in the United States during the period of
continuous employment.
(c) As used in this subsection, “continuous employment” means employment with a public  char-
ter school that is not interrupted by a period of more than 30 consecutive calendar days.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1522 (SB 1522-B) Page 29
(6) For teacher licensing,  employment experience in public charter schools shall be considered
equivalent to experience in public schools.
(7)(a) Any  person employed as an administrator in a public charter school shall be licensed or
registered to administer by the Teacher Standards and Practices Commission.
(b) Any person employed as a teacher in a public charter school shall be licensed or  registered
to teach by the commission.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection, at least one-half  of the total full-time
equivalent (FTE) teaching and administrative staff at the public charter school shall be licensed by
the commission pursuant to ORS 342.125.
(8) Notwithstanding ORS 243.650, a  public charter school shall be considered a school district
for purposes of ORS 243.650 to 243.809. An employee  of a public charter school may be a member
of a labor organization or organize  with other employees to bargain collectively. Bargaining units
at the public charter school may be  separate from other bargaining units of the sponsor or of the
school district in which the public charter school is located. Employees of a  public charter school
may be part of the bargaining units  of the sponsor or of the school district in which the public
charter school is located.
(9) An entity described in ORS 338.005 (4) may not waive  the right to sponsor a public charter
school in a collective bargaining agreement.
HEALTH CARE BENEFITS FOR PART-TIME FACULTY
SECTION 30.
 ORS 350.355 is amended to read:
350.355. (1)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this  subsection, a part-time faculty member
at a public institution of higher education is eligible  for the same employee-only health care benefits
as full-time faculty members if the part-time faculty member is  working at a level equal to at least
half of a full-time equivalent employee determined as an average  either at a  single public institu-
tion of higher education or in aggregate at multiple  public institutions of higher education during
at least three of the four previous academic terms.
(b) The total  cost of providing any health benefit plan offered by a public institution of higher
education to a part-time faculty member  under this section may not increase annually by more than
the annual increase in premium amounts paid for contracted health benefit plans that is  permitted
under ORS 243.135 (8)(b) or 243.866 (9)(b).
(2)(a) In order to receive employee-only health care benefits under this  section, a part-time fac-
ulty member must select a home  public institution of higher education for the duration of the benefit
year under a process established  by each institution. A home public institution of higher education
selected under this subsection:
(A) Must be one at which the part-time faculty member is working  during the academic term
at the time of the application; and
(B) Is responsible for:
(i) Determining  whether the part-time faculty member is eligible to receive health care benefits
under this section;
(ii) Determining, on [ a semiannual ] an annual basis, whether a part-time faculty member  who
was found to be eligible to receive health care benefits under  sub-subparagraph (i) of this subpara-
graph continues to be eligible to receive health care benefits under this section;
(iii) Collecting the premiums for health benefit plans that must be paid by the part-time  faculty
member under subsection (3) of this section;
(iv) Paying the full cost of the insurance premiums  for providing health benefit plans to the
part-time faculty member, subject to  reimbursement as described in subsection (4) of this section;
and
(v) Administering and providing health benefit plans to the  part-time faculty member in the
manner described in this section.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1522 (SB 1522-B) Page 30
(b) In order to receive health care benefits under this section, a part-time faculty member must
provide the home public institution of higher education with all  information necessary for the in-
stitution to determine the eligibility of the part-time faculty member to receive health  care benefits
under this section.
(3)(a) Except as provided in  paragraph (b) of this subsection, a part-time faculty member at a
public institution of higher education shall pay 10 percent of all  insurance premiums for health
benefit plans.
(b) A public institution  of higher education may provide by collective bargaining at the institu-
tion to pay for some or all of  the insurance premiums that must otherwise be paid by a part-time
faculty member under paragraph (a) of this subsection.  The public institution of higher education
may not be reimbursed under subsection (4) of this  section for the costs the institution incurs to
provide health benefit plans under this paragraph.
(4)(a) Every three  months a public institution of higher education may request reimbursement
from the Higher Education Coordinating Commission for the cost of paying insurance premiums for
providing health benefit plans to each part-time faculty member who has selected the institution  as
the faculty member’s home public institution  of higher education under subsection (2) of this section.
(b) The commission shall  use moneys from the Part-Time Faculty Insurance Fund established
under ORS 350.357 to fully reimburse  each public institution of higher education for all documented
costs requested by the institution under this subsection,  except for any costs described in subsection
(3) of this section.
(5) Unless otherwise provided for by collective bargaining, a part-time faculty member at  a
public institution  of higher education who is eligible for health care benefits under subsection (1)
of this section may receive health care benefits only in the manner provided by this section.
(6) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission may adopt rules necessary  to implement
subsection (4) of this section.
SECTION 31.
The amendments to ORS 350.355 by section 30 of this 2022 Act apply to de-
terminations of eligibility for health benefits that are made for an open  enrollment period
that occurs on or after the effective date of this 2022 Act.
APPROPRIATIONS
SECTION 32. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Corrections by section  1 (2), chapter 468, Oregon Laws 2021, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for central administration and administrative services,
is increased by $680,737 to carry out the provisions of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 33. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Corrections by section  1 (3), chapter 468, Oregon Laws 2021, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for correctional services, is increased by  $252,842 to carry
out the provisions of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 34. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by  section 1 (1), chapter 660, Oregon
Laws 2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for Higher Education  Coordinating Com-
mission programs and operations, is increased by $136,667  to carry out the provisions of this
2022 Act.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 35. The unit captions  used in this 2022 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2022 Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
Enrolled Senate Bill 1522 (SB 1522-B) Page 31
SECTION 36. This 2022 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2022 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate March 1, 2022
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House March 3, 2022
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1522 (SB 1522-B) Page 32